Hawaii statutes.
[§674-15] Limitations upon award of
compensation or corrective action. No claim shall be made under this
chapter for which a remedy was or is provided elsewhere under the laws of this
State, which is or was the subject of pending or prior litigation, or which is
predicated, in whole or in part, on an act or omission which occurred prior to
August 21, 1959. [L 1991, c 323, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next